District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.11

General.

In compliance with federal regulations issued pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 31306 , the Mayor and each personnel authority shall adopt and administer a program and issue rules for conducting pre-employment, reasonable suspicion, random, post-accident, return-to-duty, and follow-up testing of employees who are employed as drivers of commercial motor vehicles, or who are candidates for such employment, for the use of alcohol and controlled substances.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2051
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(v), 45 DCR 2464

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.01 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

For temporary addition of this section, comprising subchapter XXI-A of Chapter 6 of Title 1, see § 2 of the Testing of District Government Drivers of Commercial Motor Vehicles for Alcohol and Controlled Substances Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-13, March 3, 1997, 44 DCR 1747), § 2 of the Testing of District Government Drivers of Commercial Motor Vehicles for Alcohol and Controlled Substances Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-248, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 770), and § 2 of the Testing of District Government Drivers of Commercial Motor Vehicles for Alcohol and Controlled Substances Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-294, February 27, 1998, 45 DCR 1762).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of the Testing of District Government Drivers of Commercial Motor Vehicles for Alcohol and Controlled Substances Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-96, April 30, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2787).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of the Testing of District Government Drivers of Commercial Motor Vehicles for Alcohol and Controlled Substances Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-204, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2399).
1981 Ed., § 1-621.51.